Washington statutes.
RCW 16.67.060

Director to appoint members—Recommendations by industry.

The director shall appoint the members of the commission. In making such appointments, the director shall take into consideration recommendations made to him or her by organizations who represent or who are engaged in the same type of production or business as the person recommended for appointment as a member of the commission.

Commencing on June 1, 1993, and by June 1 of each subsequent year, organizations under this section shall make a recommendation as required, to the director of a person to serve on the commission.

[ 1993 c 40 s 4; 1991 c 9 s 3; 1969 c 133 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1993 c 40: See note following RCW 16.67.040.